scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_am.yaml
     azhewebishkan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ezhewebishkang
     azhewebishkan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: azhewebishkan
     aaba'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaaba'aan
     aaba'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndaaba'aan
     aaba'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaaba'aan
     aaba'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aaba'ang
     aaba'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaaba'ang
     aaba'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaba'an
     aabanaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndaabanaabandaan
     aabanaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabanaabandaan
     aabanaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaabanaabandaan
     aabanaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabanaabandaan
     aabanaabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabanaabandang
     aabanaabandan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabanaabandang
     aabanaabandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabanaabandan 
     aabashkwemaginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabashkwemaginaan
     aabashkwemaginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabashkwemaginaan
     aabashkwemaginan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabashkwemaginang
     aabashkwemaginan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabashkwemaginan
     aabaabika'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaabaabika'aan
     aabaabika'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabaabika'aan
     aabaabika'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaabaabika'aan
     aabaabika'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaabaabika'aan
     aabaabika'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabaabika'aan
     aabaabika'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: oyaabaabika'aan
     aabaabika'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabaabika'ang
     aabaabika'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabaabika'ang
     aabaabika'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabaabika'an
     aabaabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaabaabiiginaan
     aabaabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabaabiiginaan
     aabaabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaabaabiiginaan
     aabaabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabaabiiginaan
     aabaabiiginan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabaabiiginang
     aabaabiiginan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabaabiiginang
     aabaabiiginan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabaabiiginan 
     aabiskonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaabiskonaan
     aabiskonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabiskonaan
     aabiskonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaabiskonaan
     aabiskonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaabiskonaan
     aabiskonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabiskonaan
     aabiskonan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabiskonang
     aabiskonan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabiskonang
     aabiskonan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabiskonan 
     aabiskwandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabiskwandaan
     aabiskwandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabiskwandaan
     aabiskwandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: aabiskwandang
     aabiskwandan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabiskwandang
     aabiskwandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabiskwandan
     aabiskweginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaabiskweginaan
     aabiskweginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabiskweginaan
     aabiskweginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaabiskweginaan
     aabiskweginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabiskweginaan
     aabiskweginan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabiskweginang
     aabiskweginan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabiskweginang
     aabiskweginan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabiskweginan 
     aabitawandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaabitawandaan
     aabitawandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabitawandaan
     aabitawandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabitawandang
     aabitawandan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaabitawandang
     aabitawandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabitawandan
     aabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaabiiginaan
     aabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndaabiiginaan
     aabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaabiiginaan
     aabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabiiginaan
     aabiiginan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabiiginang
     aabiiginan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: ayaabiiginang
     aabiiginan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabiiginan
     aabooda'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabooda'aan
     aabooda'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaabooda'aan
     aabooda'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aabooda'ang
     aabooda'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabooda'an
     aaboodinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaaboodinaan
     aaboodinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaaboodinaan
     aaboodinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaaboodinaan
     aaboodinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaaboodinaan
     aaboodinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aaboodinang
     aaboodinan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaaboodinang
     aaboodinan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaboodinan
     aaboojigwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaaboojigwaadaan
     aaboojigwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaaboojigwaadaan
     aaboojigwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaaboojigwaadaan
     aaboojigwaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aaboojigwaadang
     aaboojigwaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaboojigwaadan
     aaboojiweba'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaaboojiweba'aan
     aaboojiweba'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaaboojiweba'aan
     aaboojiweba'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aaboojiweba'ang
     aaboojiweba'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaboojiweba'an
     aaboojiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaaboojiiginaan
     aaboojiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaaboojiiginaan
     aaboojiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaaboojiiginaan
     aaboojiiginan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aaboojiiginang
     aaboojiiginan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaboojiiginan
     aaboozikan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaaboozikaan
     aaboozikan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaaboozikaan
     aaboozikan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndaaboozikaan
     aaboozikan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaabozikaan 
     aaboozikan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaaboozikaan
     aaboozikan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: owaaboozikaan
     aaboozikan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aaboozikang
     aaboozikan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaaboozikang
     aaboozikan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaboozikan
     aadikwe'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaadikwe'aan
     aadikwe'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaadikwe'aan
     aadikwe'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aadikwe'ang
     aadikwe'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aadikwe'an
     aadodan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaadodaan
     aadodan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaadodaan
     aadodan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaadodaan
     aadodan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaadodaan
     aadodan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aadodang
     aadodan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaadodang
     aadodan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aadodan
     aagonwetan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaagonwetaan
     aagonwetan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaagonwetaan
     aagonwetan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaagonwetaan
     aagonwetan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaagonwetaan
     aagonwetan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aagonwetang
     aagonwetan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaagonwetang
     aagonwetan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aagonwetan
     aakomaandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaakomaandaan
     aakomaandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaakomaandaan
     aakomaandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaakomaandaan
     aakomaandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aakomaandang
     aakomaandan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaakomaandang
     aakomaandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aakomaandan
     aanawendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaanawendaan
     aanawendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanawendaan
     aanawendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaanawendaan
     aanawendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanawendaan
     aanawendan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanawendang
     aanawendan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaanawendang
     aanawendan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanawendan
     aandagindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaandagindaan
     aandagindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaandagindaan
     aandagindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaandagindaan
     aandagindan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaandagindaan
     aandagindan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aandagindang
     aandagindan+VTI+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaandaginang
     aandagindan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aandagindan 
     aandaabikinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaandaabikinaan
     aandaabikinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaandaabikinaan
     aandaabikinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaandaabikinaan
     aandaabikinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aandaabikinang
     aandaabikinan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaandaabikinang
     aandaakonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaandaakonaan
     aandaakonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaandaakonaan
     aandaakonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaandaakonaan
     aandaakonan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aandaakonang
     aandaakonan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaandaakonang
     aandaakonan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aandaakonan
     aandinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaandinaan
     aandinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaandinaan
     aandinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: aandinang
     aandinan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaandinang
     aandinan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aandinan
     aanikanootan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaanikanootaan
     aanikanootan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanikanootaan
     aanikanootan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaanikanootaan
     aanikanootan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanikanootaan
     aanikanootan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanikanootang
     aanikanootan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaanikanootang
     aanikanootan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanikanootan
     aanikoogwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanikoogwaadaan
     aanikoogwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndaanikoogwaadaan
     aanikoogwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaanikogwaadaan
     aanikoogwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanikoogwaadaan
     aanikoogwaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanikoogwaadang
     aanikoogwaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanikoogwaadan
     aanjibii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaanjibii'aan
     aanjibii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanjibii'aan
     aanjibii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaanjibii'aan
     aanjibii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanjibii'aan
     aanjibii'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanjibii'ang
     aanjibii'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaanjibii'ang
     aanjibii'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanjibii'an
     aanjidaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanjidaabaadaan
     aanjidaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanjidaabaadaan
     aanjidaabaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanjidaabaadang
     aanjidaabaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanjidaabaadan
     aanjigwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanjigwaadaan
     aanjigwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanjigwaadaan
     aanjigwaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanjigwaadang
     aanjigwaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanjigwaadan
     aanjinikaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaanjinikaadaan
     aanjinikaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanjinikaadaan
     aanjinikaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanjinikaadang
     aanjinikaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaanjinikaadang
     aanjinikaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: aanjinikaadan
     aanzikan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaanzikaan
     aanzikan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaanzikaan
     aanzikan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaanzikaan
     aanzikan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaanzikaan
     aanzikan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aanzikang
     aanzikan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaanzikang
     aanzikan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanzikan
     aasonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaasonaan
     aasonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaasonaan
     aasonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaasonaan
     aasonan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aasonang
     aasonan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaasonang
     aasonan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aasonan
     aaswaakwa'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaaswaakwa'aan
     aaswaakwa'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaaswaakwa'aan
     aaswaakwa'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aaswaakwa'ang
     aaswaakwa'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aaswaakwa'an
     aatawe'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaatawe'aan
     aatawe'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaatawe'aan
     aatawe'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aatawe'ang
     aatawe'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aatawe'an
     aatawenan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaatawenaan
     aatawenan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaatawenaan
     aatawenan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaatawenaan
     aatawenan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aatawenang
     aatawenan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aatawenan
     aataweshkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaataweshkaan
